cs: Frekvenční pásmo bezdrátového telefonu: 1,8 GHz; 1,9 GHz (DECT 6.0); 2,4 GHz; 5,8 GHz; 900 MHz; Dvoupásmové (2,4 GHz / 5,8 GHz); Třípásmové; Jiné
tr: Kablosuz telefon frekans bandı: 1,8 GHz; 1,9 GHz (DECT 6.0); 2,4 GHz; 5,8 GHz; 900 MHz; Çift bant (2,4 GHz/5,8 GHz); Üç bantlı; Diğer
da: Frekvensbånd for trådløs telefon: 1,8 GHz; 1,9 GHz (DECT 6.0); 2,4 GHz; 5,8 GHz; 900 MHz; Dual-band (2,4 GHz/5,8 GHz); Tri-band; Andet
ro-RO: Banda de frecvență a telefonului fără fir: 1,8 GHz; 1.9 GHz (DECT 6.0); 2,4 GHz; 5,8 GHz; 900 MHz; Dual-band (2,4 GHz / 5,8 GHz); Bandă triplă; Altele
en: Cordless phone frequency band: 1.8 GHz; 1.9 GHz (DECT 6.0); 2.4 GHz; 5.8 GHz; 900 MHz; Dual-band (2.4 GHz / 5.8 GHz); Tri-band; Other
fi: Langattoman puhelimen taajuuskaista: 1,8 GHz; 1,9 GHz (DECT 6.0); 2,4 GHz; 5,8 GHz; 900 MHz; Kaksikaistainen (2,4 GHz / 5,8 GHz); Kolmikaistainen; Muu
zh-CN: 无绳电话频段: 1.8 GHz; 1.9 GHz (DECT 6.0); 2.4 GHz; 5.8 GHz; 900 MHz; 双频 (2.4 GHz/5.8 GHz); 三频; 其他
pt-BR: Faixa de frequência de telefone sem fio: 1.8 GHz; 1.9 GHz (DECT 6.0); 2.4 GHz; 5.8 GHz; 900 MHz; Banda dupla (2,4 GHz / 5.8 GHz); Banda tripla; Outro
bg-BG: Честотна лента на безжичния телефон: 1.8 GHz; 1.9 GHz (DECT 6.0); 2.4 GHz; 5.8 GHz; 900 MHz; Двулентов (2.4 GHz / 5.8 GHz); Трибандов; Други
vi: Băng tần điện thoại không dây: 1,8 GHz; 1,9 GHz (DECT 6.0); 2,4 GHz; 5,8 GHz; 900 MHz; Băng tần kép (2,4 GHz/5,8 GHz); Ba băng tần; Khác
pt-PT: Banda de frequência do telefone sem fios: 1,8 GHz; 1,9 GHz (DECT 6.0); 2,4 GHz; 5,8 GHz; 900 MHz; Banda dupla (2,4 GHz/5,8 GHz); Banda tripla; Outro
ru: Диапазон частот беспроводного телефона: 1,8 ГГц; 1,9 ГГц (DECT 6.0); 2,4 ГГц; 5,8 ГГц; 900 МГц; Два диапазона (2,4 ГГц и 5,8 ГГц); Три диапазона; Другой
el: Ζώνη συχνοτήτων ασύρματου τηλεφώνου: 1.8 GHz; 1.9 GHz (DECT 6.0); 2.4 GHz; 5.8 GHz; 900 MHz; Διπλή ζώνη (2.4 GHz/5.8 GHz); Τριζωνική; Άλλο
pl: Pasmo częstotliwości telefonu bezprzewodowego: 1,8 GHz; 1,9 GHz (DECT 6.0); 2,4 GHz; 5,8 GHz; 900 MHz; Dwupasmowy (2,4 GHz / 5,8 GHz); Trójpasmowy; Inne
hu: Vezeték nélküli telefon frekvenciasávja: 1,8 GHz; 1,9 GHz (DECT 6.0); 2,4 GHz; 5,8 GHz; 900 MHz; Kétsávos (2,4 GHz / 5,8 GHz); Háromsávos; Egyéb
ko: 무선 전화 주파수 대역: 1.8GHz; 1.9GHz(DECT 6.0); 2.4GHz; 5.8GHz; 900MHz; 듀얼 밴드(2.4GHz/5GHz); 트라이밴드; 기타
ja: コードレス電話の周波数帯域: 1.8GHz; 1.9GHz (DECT 6.0); 2.4GHz; 5.8GHz; 900MHz; デュアルバンド (2.4GHz/5GHz); トライバンド; その他
nl: Frequentieband voor draadloze telefoons: 1,8 GHz; 1,9 GHz (DECT 6.0); 2,4 GHz; 5,8 GHz; 900 MHz; Dual-band (2,4 GHz / 5,8 GHz); Tri-band; Andere
es: Banda de frecuencia de teléfonos inalámbricos: 1.8 GHz; 1.9 GHz (DECT 6.0); 2.4 GHz; 5.8 GHz; 900 MHz; Banda dual (2.4 GHz/5.8 GHz); Tribanda; Otros
zh-TW: 無線電話頻段: 1.8 GHz; 1.9 GHz (DECT 6.0); 2.4 GHz; 5.8 GHz; 900 MHz; 雙頻段 (2.4 GHz/5.8 GHz); 三頻段; 其他
sl-SI: Frekvenčni pas brezžičnega telefona: 1,8 GHz; 1,9 GHz (DECT 6.0); 2,4 GHz; 5,8 GHz; 900 MHz; Dvopasovni (2,4 GHz / 5,8 GHz); Tripasovno; Drugo
it: Banda di frequenza del telefono senza fili: 1,8 GHz; 1,9 GHz (DECT 6.0); 2,4 GHz; 5,8 GHz; 900 MHz; Doppia banda (2,4 GHz/5,8 GHz); Banda tripla; Altro
de: Frequenzband für schnurlose Telefone: 1,8 GHz; 1,9 GHz (DECT 6.0); 2,4 GHz; 5,8 GHz; 900 MHz; Dual-Band (2,4 GHz / 5,8 GHz); Tri-Band; Sonstiges
fr: Bande de fréquence du téléphone sans fil: 1,8 GHz; 1,9 GHz (DECT 6.0); 2,4 GHz; 5,8 GHz; 900 MHz; Bi-bande (2,4 GHz / 5,8 GHz); Tri-bande; Autre
lt-LT: Belaidžio telefono dažnių juosta: 1.8 GHz; 1.9 GHz (DECT 6.0); 2.4 GHz; 5.8 GHz; 900 MHz; Dviejų juostų (2.4 GHz / 5.8 GHz); Trijų juostų; Kita
sk-SK: Frekvenčné pásmo bezdrôtového telefónu: 1,8 GHz; 1,9 GHz (DECT 6.0); 2,4 GHz; 5,8 GHz; 900 MHz; Dvojpásmový (2,4 GHz / 5.8 GHz); Tri-pásmové; Iné
sv: Frekvensband för trådlös telefon: 1,8 GHz; 1,9 GHz (DECT 6.0); 2,4 GHz; 5,8 GHz; 900 MHz; Dubbelband (2,4 GHz / 5.8 GHz); Tri-band; Övrigt
hr-HR: Frekvencijski pojas bežičnog telefona: 1,8 GHz; 1,9 GHz (DECT 6.0); 2,4 GHz; 5,8 GHz; 900 MHz; Dvopojasni (2,4 GHz / 5,8 GHz); Tropojasni; Ostalo
nb: Frekvensbånd for trådløs telefon: 1,8 GHz; 1,9 GHz (DECT 6.0); 2,4 GHz; 5,8 GHz; 900 MHz; Dobbelbånd (2,4 GHz / 5.8 GHz); Trippelbånd; Annet
th: ย่านความถี่โทรศัพท์ไร้สาย: 1.8 GHz; 1.9 GHz (DECT 6.0); 2.4 GHz; 5.8 GHz; 900 MHz; ดูอัลแบนด์ (2.4 GHz / 5.8 GHz); ไตรแบนด์; อื่นๆ